Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-496
License; form and contents; requirements.

Licenses authorized to be issued under sections 37-484 to 37-496 shall be prepared by the commission. They shall be in such form and content as may be prescribed by the commission and be supplied by the commission, subject to such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 14, p. 496;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-914;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 206;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 18.